Oklahoma, session 2026, SB609.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 11 O.S. 2021, Section 50-111.2, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 50-111.2. A. A member of the Oklahoma Police Pension
and Retirement System may receive up to five (5) years of credited
service accumulated by the member while a member of the Oklahoma
Firefighters Pension and Retirement System, the Oklahoma Law
Enforcement Retirement System, the Teacher’s Retirement System of
Oklahoma, the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System, or a
county retirement system created pursuant to Section 951 of Title 19
of the Oklahoma Statutes, or an Oklahoma municipal retirement
system, or a state, county, or municipal retirement system from a
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB609 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

RBS No. 430
stat e other than Oklahoma, if the member is not receiving or
eligible to receive retirement credit or benefits from said service
in any other public retirement system. The member shall decide the
number of years of credited service, not to exceed five (5) years,
to purchase. The State Board shall determine the amount for the
purchase pursuant to Section 50-111.4 of this title. The amount may
be paid through a trustee-to-trustee transfer to the Oklahoma Police
Pension and Retirement System from another system designated in this
section, and/or through payments made by the member. The
transferred credited service of the member from another retirement
system pursuant to this section shall not alter the member’s normal
retirement date or vesting requirements. The transferred credited
service will be added after the member reaches normal retirement
date or vesting date.
B. The Oklahoma Police Pension and Retirement System shall
transfer credited service to another Oklahoma state retirement
system upon request of former members. Upon transfer, the former
member shall have forfeited all rights in the Oklahoma Police
Pension and Retirement System. Employee and city contributions of
the former municipal retirement systems prior to January 1, 1981,
are not transferable.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON RETIREMENT AND GOVERNMENT
RESOURCES
February 17, 2026 - DO PASS

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB609 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)